North Carolina statutes. Chapter 153A. Counties.
Article 19. Regional Planning Commissions.

§ 153A-391.
Creation; admission of new members.

Two or more counties, cities, or counties and cities may create a regional planning commission by adopting identical concurrent resolutions to that effect in accordance with the provisions and procedures of this Article. A county or city may join an existing regional planning commission with the consent of the existing member governments.

The resolution creating a regional planning commission may be modified, amended, or repealed by the unanimous action of the member governments.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

Local Modification.

Cherokee, Graham, Jackson and Swain: 1973, c. 1406.

§ 153A-392.
Contents of resolution.

The resolutions creating a regional planning commission shall:

Specify the name of the commission;

Establish the number of delegates to represent each member government, fix the delegates’ terms of office and the conditions, if any, for their removal, provide methods for filling vacancies, and prescribe the compensation and allowances, if any, to be paid to delegates;

Set out the method of determining the financial support that will be given to the commission by each member government;

Set out the budgetary and fiscal control procedures to be followed by the commission, which shall substantially comply with the Local Government Budget and Fiscal Control Act (Chapter 159, Subchapter III).

In addition the resolution may, but need not, contain rules and regulations for the conduct of commission business and any other matters pertaining to the organization, powers, and functioning of the commission that the member governments consider appropriate.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-393.
Withdrawal from commission.

A member government may withdraw from a regional planning commission by giving at least two years’ written notice to the other counties and cities involved.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-394.
Organization of the commission.

Upon its creation, a regional planning commission shall meet at a time and place agreed upon by the counties and cities involved. It shall organize by electing a chairman and any other officers that the resolution specifies or that the commission considers advisable. The commission may adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business. All commission meetings shall be open to the public.

The chairman of the commission may appoint any committees authorized by the bylaws. Committee members need not be delegates to the commission.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-395.
Powers and duties.

A regional planning commission may:

Apply for, accept, receive, and disburse funds, grants, and services made available to it by the State of North Carolina or any agency thereof, the federal government or any agency thereof, any unit of local government or any agency thereof, or any private or civic agency;

Employ personnel;

Contract with consultants;

Contract for services with the State of North Carolina, any other state, the United States, or any agency of those governments;

Study and inventory regional goals, resources, and problems;

Prepare and amend regional development plans, which may include recommendations for land use within the region, recommendations concerning the need for and general location of public works of regional concern, recommendations for economic development of the region, and any other relevant matters;

Cooperate with and provide assistance to federal, State, other regional, and local planning activities within the region;

Encourage local efforts toward economic development;

Make recommendations for review and action to its member governments and other public agencies that perform functions within the region;

(9a)

For the purpose of meeting its office space and program needs, acquire real property by purchase, gift, or otherwise, and improve that property. It may pledge real property as security for an indebtedness used to finance acquisition of that property or for improvements to that property, subject to approval by the Local Government Commission as required under

G.S. 159-153

. It may not exercise the power of eminent domain in exercising the powers granted by this subdivision.

Exercise any other power necessary to the discharge of its duties.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2006-211, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-211, s. 2, effective August 8, 2006, added subdivision (9a).

§ 153A-396.
Fiscal affairs.

Each county and city having membership in a regional planning commission may appropriate to the commission revenues not otherwise limited as to use by law. Services of personnel, use of equipment and office space, and other services may be made available to a commission by its member governments as a part of their financial support.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-397.
Reports.

Each regional planning commission shall prepare and distribute to its member governments and make available to the public an annual report of its activities, including a financial statement.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1.

§ 153A-398.
Regional planning and economic development commissions.

Two or more counties, cities, or counties and cities may create a regional planning and economic development commission by adopting identical concurrent resolutions to that effect. Such a commission has the powers granted by this Article and the powers granted by Chapter 158, Article 2. If such a commission is created, it shall maintain separate books of account for appropriations and expenditures made pursuant to this Article and for appropriations and expenditures made pursuant to Chapter 158, Article 2.

History.

1961, c. 722, s. 3; 1973, c. 822, s. 1; 2013-360, s. 15.28(e); 2013-363, s. 5.7(b).

§§ 153A-399,
153A-400.

Reserved for future codification purposes.